Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.333

Miscellaneous state funds—Warrants to be paid from general fund.

From and after the first day of May, 1955, all warrants drawn on any fund abolished by RCW 43.79.331 and not theretofore presented for payment, shall be paid from the general fund from the account to which the moneys of the abolished fund are directed by RCW 43.79.330 to be transferred.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.333. Prior: 1955 c 370 s 4.]